District of Columbia statutes.
5-418

Cadet program — Authorized; purpose; preference for appointment; appropriations.

(a)

The Chief of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department may establish a cadet program for the purpose of instructing, training, and exposing interested persons, primarily young adults residing in the District of Columbia, to the operations of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department and the duties, tasks, and responsibilities of serving as a dual-trained firefighter/paramedic/emergency medical technician with the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department. The Fire Chief shall establish performance measures for the program.

(b)

A person successfully completing the required training and service in a cadet program established pursuant to this section shall be accorded full preference for appointment as a member of the Metropolitan Police Department or of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department, if the person shall have met all other requirements pertaining to membership in the chosen Department.

(c)

There may be appropriated the funds necessary for the administration of this section.

History

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-172, § 2(b)-(d), 29 DCR 5745
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 402(a), (b), 51 DCR 9406

Cross References

Cadet training programs, funding and administration, see § 38-912.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-109.02 and § 5-419.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-318.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-194 rewrote subsec. (a); and in subsec. (b), substituted “Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department” for “District of Columbia Fire Department”. Prior to amendment, subsec. (a) had read as follows: “(a) The Chief of the District of Columbia Fire Department may establish a firefighter cadet program for the purpose of instructing, training, and exposing interested persons, primarily young adults residing in the District of Columbia, to the operations of the District of Columbia Fire Department and the duties, tasks, and responsibilities of serving as a firefighter with the District of Columbia Fire Department.”